North Carolina statutes. Chapter 130A. Public Health.
Article 11. Wastewater Systems.

§ 130A-333.
Purpose.

The General Assembly finds and declares that continued installation, at a rapidly and constantly accelerating rate, of septic tank systems and other types of wastewater systems in a faulty or improper manner and in areas where unsuitable soil and population
density adversely affect the efficiency and functioning of these systems, has a detrimental effect on the public health and environment through contamination of land, groundwater and surface waters. Recognizing, however, that wastewater
can be rendered ecologically safe and the public health protected if methods of wastewater collection, treatment and disposal are properly regulated and recognizing that wastewater collection, treatment and disposal will continue to
be necessary to meet the needs of an expanding population, the General Assembly intends to ensure the regulation of wastewater collection, treatment and disposal systems so that these systems may continue to be used, where appropriate,
without jeopardizing the public health.

History.
1973, c. 452, s. 3; 1981, c. 949, s. 3; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 944, ss. 1, 2.

Extension of Permits.

For provisions pertaining to extension of permits during state of economic emergency in the real estate sector, pursuant to Session Laws 2009-406, ss. 1 through 5.1, as amended by Session Laws 2009-484, s. 5.1, 2009-550, s. 5.2, 2009-572, ss. 1-3, and
Session Laws 2010-177, s. 1, see the Editor’s note at G.S. 160A-385.1.

§ 130A-334.
Definitions.

The following definitions shall apply throughout this Article:

“Accepted wastewater system” has the same meaning as in

G.S. 130A-343

.

(1a) “Approved agency for special inspection” means an individual, corporation, company, association, or partnership that is objective, competent, and independent from the contractor who is responsible for the work that is inspected. The agency shall
disclose possible conflicts of interest in a manner such that objectivity can be confirmed.

(1b) “Approved special inspector” means a person who demonstrates competence to the satisfaction of the professional engineer who designed the wastewater system for the inspection of the construction or operation subject to special inspection.

(1c) “Construction” means any work at the site of placement done for the purpose of preparing a residence, place of business or place of public assembly for initial occupancy, or subsequent additions or modifications which increase sewage flow.

(1d) “Construction observation” means the visual observation of the construction and installation of the wastewater system for general conformance with the construction documents prepared by the professional engineer who designed the wastewater system.
Construction observation that is conducted by the professional engineer who designed the wastewater system does not include or waive the requirement to conduct special inspections.

(1e) “Conventional wastewater system” has the same meaning as in

G.S. 130A-343

.

(1f) “Department” means the Department of Health and Human Services.

(1g) “Engineered option permit” means an on-site wastewater system that is permitted pursuant to the rules adopted by the Commission in accordance with this Article, meets the criteria established by

G.S. 130A-336.1

, and is designed by a professional engineer who is licensed under Chapter 89C of the General Statutes who has expertise in the design of on-site wastewater systems.

(1h) “Ground absorption system” means a system of tanks, treatment units, nitrification fields, and appurtenances for wastewater collection, treatment, and subsurface disposal.

Repealed by Session Laws 1985, c. 462, s. 18.

(2a) “Industrial process wastewater” means any water-carried waste resulting from any process of industry, manufacture, trade, or business.

(2b) “Licensed geologist” means a person who is licensed as a geologist under the provisions of Chapter 89E of the General Statutes.

(2c) “Licensed soil scientist” has the same meaning as in

G.S. 89F-3

.

“Location” means the initial placement for occupancy of a residence, place of business or place of public assembly.

(3a)
“Maintenance” means normal or routine maintenance including replacement of broken pipes, cleaning, or adjustment to an existing wastewater system.

, (5) Repealed by Session Laws 1985, c. 462, s. 18.

(6) “Place of business” means a store, warehouse, manufacturing establishment, place of amusement or recreation, service station, office building or any other place where people work.

(7) “Place of public assembly” means a fairground, auditorium, stadium, church, campground, theater or any other place where people assemble.

(7a) “Plat” means a property survey prepared by a registered land surveyor, drawn to a scale of one inch equals no more than 60 feet, that includes: the specific location of the proposed facility and appurtenances, the site for the proposed wastewater
system, and the location of water supplies and surface waters. “Plat” also means, for subdivision lots approved by the local planning authority if a local planning authority exists at the time of application for a permit under
this Article, a copy of the subdivision plat that has been recorded with the county register of deeds and is accompanied by a site plan that is drawn to scale.

(7b) “Pretreatment” means any biological, chemical, or physical process or system for improving wastewater quality and reducing wastewater constituents prior to final treatment and disposal in a subsurface wastewater system and includes, but is not limited
to aeration, clarification, digestion, disinfection, filtration, separation, and settling.

(7c) “Professional engineer” has the same meaning as in

G.S. 89C-3

.

(8) “Public or community wastewater system” means a single system of wastewater collection, treatment and disposal owned and operated by a sanitary district, a metropolitan sewage district, a water and sewer authority, a county or municipality or a public
utility.

(9) “Relocation” means the displacement of a residence or place of business from one site to another.

(9a) “Repair” means the extension, alteration, replacement, or relocation of existing components of a wastewater system. Replacement of a damaged gravity distribution box by an on-site wastewater contractor certified under Article 5 of Chapter 90A of
the General Statutes shall not constitute a repair to a permitted wastewater system.

(10)
“Residence” means a private home, dwelling unit in a multiple family structure, hotel, motel, summer camp, labor work camp, manufactured home, institution or any other place where people reside.

(10a)
“Secretary” means the Secretary of Health and Human Services.

(11)
Repealed by Session Laws 1992, c. 944, s. 3.

(12)
“Septic tank system” means a subsurface wastewater system consisting of a settling tank and a subsurface disposal field.

(13)
“Sewage” means the liquid and solid human body waste and liquid waste generated by water-using fixtures and appliances, including those associated with foodhandling. The term does not include industrial process
wastewater or sewage that is combined with industrial process wastewater.

(13a)
“Site plan” means a drawing not necessarily drawn to scale that shows the existing and proposed property lines with dimensions, the location of the facility and appurtenances, the site for the proposed wastewater
system, and the location of water supplies and surface waters.

(13b)
“Special inspection” means a required inspection of the materials, installation, fabrication, erection, or placement of components and systems that require special expertise to ensure compliance with referenced
standards and the construction documents prepared by the professional engineer.

(14)
“Wastewater” means any sewage or industrial process wastewater discharged, transmitted, or collected from a residence, place of business, place of public assembly, or other places into a wastewater system.

(14a)
“Wastewater dispersal product” means a product approved by the Department for dispersing wastewater effluent within the subsurface dispersal field in a ground absorption system.

(15)
“Wastewater system” means a system of wastewater collection, treatment, and disposal in single or multiple components, including a ground absorption system, privy, septic tank system, public or community wastewater
system, wastewater reuse or recycle system, mechanical or biological wastewater treatment system, any other similar system, and any chemical toilet used only for human waste.

History.
1973, c. 452, s. 4; 1981, c. 949, s. 3; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1985, c. 462, s. 18; c. 487, s. 9; 1987, c. 435; 1991, c. 256, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 944, s. 3; c. 1028, s. 4; 1995, c. 285, s. 1; 1995 (Reg. Sess.,
1996), c. 585, s. 1; 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, ss. 27.31(a), (b); 1997-443, s. 11A.82; 2011-145, s. 13.3(bbb); 2014-120, s. 40(a); 2015-241, s. 14.30(v); 2015-286, s. 4.14(a); 2017-139, s. 2; 2018-114, s. 11(a), (b).

§ 130A-335.
Wastewater collection, treatment and disposal; rules.

A person owning or controlling a residence, place of business or a place of public assembly shall provide an approved wastewater system. Except as may be allowed under another provision of law, all wastewater from water-using fixtures and appliances connected
to a water supply source shall discharge to the approved wastewater system. A wastewater system may include components for collection, treatment and disposal of wastewater.

(a1) Any proposed site for a residence, place of business, or a place of public assembly located in an area that is not served by an approved wastewater system for which a new wastewater system is proposed or repair is necessary for compliance may be
evaluated for soil conditions and site features by a person licensed pursuant to Chapter 89F of the General Statutes as a licensed soil scientist. For purposes of this subsection, “site features” include topography and landscape
position; soil characteristics (morphology); soil wetness; soil depth; restrictive horizons; available space; and other applicable factors that involve accepted public health principles. A person licensed pursuant to Chapter
89E of the General Statutes as a licensed geologist may evaluate the proposed site or repair area, as applicable, for geologic and hydrogeologic conditions.

(a2) Evaluations conducted by a licensed soil scientist or a licensed geologist pursuant to subsection (a1) of this section to produce design and construction features for a new proposed wastewater system or a proposed repair project for an existing wastewater
system, including the addressing of any special hydrologic conditions that may be required under the applicable rules for an authorization to construct or for permitting, shall be approved by the applicable permitting authorities
under

G.S. 130A-336

and

G.S. 130A-336.1

, provided both of the following conditions are met:

The evaluation of soil conditions, site features, or geologic and hydrogeologic conditions satisfies all requirements of this Article. The evaluation shall not cover areas outside the scope of the applicable license.

The licensed soil scientist or licensed geologist conducting the evaluation maintains an errors and omissions liability insurance policy issued by an insurer licensed under Chapter 58 of the General Statutes in an amount commensurate with the risk.Upon
receipt of a signed written evaluation from the soil scientist or licensed geologist, the Department, the Department’s authorized agents, and the local health department shall be discharged and released from any liabilities,
duties, and responsibilities imposed by statute or in common law from any claim arising out of or attributed to the soil conditions, site features, geologic conditions, or hydrogeologic conditions for which the signed written
evaluation was submitted.

All wastewater systems shall either (i) be regulated by the Department under rules adopted by the Commission or (ii) conform with the engineered option permit criteria set forth in

G.S. 130A-336.1

and under rules adopted by the Commission except for the following wastewater systems that shall be regulated by the Department under rules adopted by the Environmental Management Commission:

Wastewater collection, treatment, and disposal systems designed to discharge effluent to the land surface or surface waters.

Wastewater systems designed for groundwater remediation, groundwater injection, or landfill leachate collection and disposal.

Wastewater systems designed for the complete recycle or reuse of industrial process wastewater.

Gray water systems as defined in

G.S. 143-350

.

A wastewater system subject to approval under rules of the Commission shall be reviewed and approved under rules of a local board of health in the following circumstances:

The local board of health, on its own motion, has requested the Department to review its proposed rules concerning wastewater systems; and

The local board of health has adopted by reference the wastewater system rules adopted by the Commission, with any more stringent modifications or additions deemed necessary by the local board of health to protect the public health. Local boards of health
shall use historical experience to establish modifications or additions to rules established by the Commission; and

The Department has found that the rules, including modifications or additions to the Commission’s rules, of the local board of health concerning wastewater collection, treatment and disposal systems are at least as stringent as rules adopted by the Commission
and are sufficient and necessary to safeguard the public health.

(c1) The rules adopted by the Commission for wastewater systems approved under the engineered option permit criteria pursuant to

G.S. 130A-336.1

shall be, at a minimum, as stringent as the rules for wastewater systems established by the Commission.

(c2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a municipality shall not prohibit or regulate by ordinance or enforce an existing ordinance regulating the use of off-site wastewater systems or other systems approved by the Department under rules adopted
by the Commission when the proposed system meets the specific conditions of the approval.

The Department may, upon its own motion, upon the request of a local board of health or upon the request of a citizen of an affected county, review its findings under subsection (c) of this section.The Department shall review its findings under subsection
(c) of this section upon modification by the Commission of the rules applicable to wastewater systems. The Department may deny, suspend, or revoke the approval of local board of health wastewater system rules upon a finding that
the local wastewater rules are not as stringent as rules adopted by the Commission, are not sufficient and necessary to safeguard the public health, or are not being enforced. Suspension and revocation of approval shall be in accordance
with

G.S. 130A-23

.

(d1) The Department or owner of a wastewater system may file a written complaint with the North Carolina Board of Examiners for Engineers and Surveyors in accordance with rules and procedures adopted by the Board pursuant to Chapter 89C of the General
Statutes citing failure of a professional engineer to adhere to the rules adopted by the Commission pursuant to this Article. The Department or owner of a wastewater system may file a written complaint with the North Carolina
Board of Licensed Soil Scientists in accordance with rules and procedures adopted by the Board pursuant to Chapter 89F of the General Statutes citing failure of a licensed soil scientist to adhere to the rules adopted by the
Commission pursuant to this Article. The Department or owner of a wastewater system may file a written complaint with the North Carolina Board for Licensing of Geologists in accordance with rules and procedures adopted by the
Board pursuant to Chapter 89E of the General Statutes citing failure of a licensed geologist to adhere to the rules adopted by the Commission pursuant to this Article. The Department or owner of a wastewater system may file
a written complaint with the North Carolina On-Site Wastewater Contractors and Inspectors Certification Board in accordance with rules and procedures adopted by the Board pursuant to Article 5 of Chapter 90A of the General
Statutes citing failure of a contractor to adhere to the rules adopted by the Commission pursuant to this Article.

The rules of the Commission and the rules of the local board of health shall address at least the following: Wastewater characteristics; Design unit; Design capacity; Design volume; Criteria for the design, installation, operation, maintenance and performance
of wastewater collection, treatment and disposal systems; Soil morphology and drainage; Topography and landscape position; Depth to seasonally high water table, rock and water impeding formations; Proximity to water supply wells,
shellfish waters, estuaries, marshes, wetlands, areas subject to frequent flooding, streams, lakes, swamps and other bodies of surface or groundwaters; Density of wastewater collection, treatment and disposal systems in a geographical
area; Requirements for issuance, suspension and revocation of permits; and Other factors which affect the effective operation and performance of wastewater collection, treatment and disposal systems. The rules regarding required
design capacity and required design volume for wastewater systems shall provide that exceptions may be granted upon a showing that a system is adequate to meet actual daily water consumption.

The rules of the Commission and the rules of the local board of health shall classify systems of wastewater collection, treatment and disposal according to size, type of treatment and any other appropriate factors. The rules shall provide construction
requirements, including pretreatment and system control requirements, standards for operation, maintenance, monitoring, reporting, and ownership requirements for each classification of systems of wastewater collection, treatment
and disposal in order to prevent, as far as reasonably possible, any contamination of the land, groundwater and surface waters. The Department and local health departments may impose conditions on the issuance of permits and may
revoke the permits for failure of the system to satisfy the conditions, the rules, or this Article. Permits other than improvement permits shall be valid for a period prescribed by rule. Improvement permits shall be valid upon
a showing satisfactory to the Department or the local health department that the site and soil conditions are unaltered, that the facility, design wastewater flow, and wastewater characteristics are not increased, and that a wastewater
system can be installed that meets the permitting requirements in effect on the date the improvement permit was issued. Improvement permits for which a plat is provided shall be valid without expiration. Improvement permits for
which a site plan is provided shall be valid for five years. The period of time for which the permit is valid and a statement that the permit is subject to revocation if the site plan or plat, whichever is applicable, or the intended
use changes shall be displayed prominently on both the application form for the permit and the permit.

(f1) A preconstruction conference with the owner or developer, or an agent of the owner or developer, and a representative of the local health department shall be required for any authorization for wastewater system construction issued with an improvement
permit under

G.S. 130A-336

when the authorization is greater than five years old. Following the conference, the local health department shall advise the owner or developer of any rule changes for wastewater system construction incorporating
current technology that can reasonably be expected to improve the performance of the system. The local health department shall issue a revised authorization for wastewater system construction incorporating the rule changes
upon the written request of the owner or developer.

(f2) For each septic tank system that is designed to treat 3,000 gallons per day or less of sewage, rules adopted pursuant to subsection (f) of this section shall require the use of an effluent filter to reduce the total suspended solids entering the
drainfield and the use of an access device for each compartment of the septic tank to provide access to the compartment in order to facilitate maintenance of the septic tank. The Commission shall not adopt specifications for
the effluent filter and access device that exceed the requirements of

G.S. 130A-335.1

. Neither this section nor

G.S. 130A-335.1

shall be construed to prohibit the use of an effluent filter or access device that exceeds the requirements of G.S. 130A-335.1. The Department shall approve effluent filters that meet the requirements of this
section, G.S. 130A-335.1, and rules adopted by the Commission.

Prior to denial of an improvement permit, the local health department shall advise the applicant of possible site modifications or alternative systems, and shall provide a brief description of those systems. When an improvement permit is denied, the local
health department shall issue the site evaluation in writing stating the reasons for the unsuitable classification. The evaluation shall also inform the applicant of the right to an informal review by the Department, the right
to appeal under

G.S. 130A-24

, and to have the appeal held in the county in which the site for which the improvement permit was requested is located.

Except as provided in this subsection, a chemical or portable toilet may be placed at any location where the chemical or portable toilet can be operated and maintained under sanitary conditions. A chemical or portable toilet shall not be used as a replacement
or substitute for a water closet or urinal where a water closet or urinal connected to a permanent wastewater treatment system is required by the North Carolina State Building Code, except that a chemical or portable toilet may
be used to supplement a water closet or urinal during periods of peak use. A chemical or portable toilet shall not be used as an alternative to the repair of a water closet, urinal, or wastewater treatment system. It shall be unlawful
to discharge sewage or other waste from a chemical or portable toilet used for human waste except into a wastewater system that has been approved by the Department under rules adopted by the Commission or by the Environmental Management
Commission or at a site that is permitted by the Department under

G.S. 130A-291.1

.

The Department shall notify the Department of Revenue of all wastewater dispersal product approvals and revocations within 60 days of approval or revocation.

History.
1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1973, c. 471, s. 1; c. 476, s. 128; c. 860; 1977, c. 857, s. 1; 1979, c. 788, s. 2; 1981, c. 949, s. 3; c. 1127, s. 47; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1987, c. 267, ss. 1, 2; 1989, c. 727, s. 147; c. 764, ss. 6,
7; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1075, s. 2; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 944, s. 4; 1993, c. 173, s. 5; 1995, c. 285, s. 1; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 585, s. 2; 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, s. 27.31(c); 1998-126, s. 1; 1998-217, s.
46(a); 2008-143, s. 13; 2011-394, s. 12(c); 2014-115, s. 10.1; 2014-120, s. 40(b); 2015-286, s. 4.14(b); 2017-139, s. 3; 2017-209, s. 18(a); 2018-114, s. 11(c); 2019-126, s. 1; 2019-131, s. 1; 2019-177, s. 7.1.

United States Postal Service Cluster Box Units/No Stormwater Permit Modification Required.

Session Laws 2014-120, s. 47(a)-(e), provides: “(a) The definitions set out in

G.S. 130A-343

shall apply to this section.

“(b) 15A NCAC 18A .1969(j) (Modification of Approved Systems). — Until the effective date of the revised permanent rule that the Commission is required to adopt pursuant to Section 47(d) of this act, the Commission and the Department shall implement 15A
NCAC 18A .1969(j) (Modification of Approved Systems) as provided in Section 47(c) of this act.

“(c) Implementation. — Notwithstanding 15A NCAC 18A .1969(j) (Modification of Approved Systems), the rule shall be implemented so as to not require a survey or audit of installed modified accepted systems in order to confirm the satisfactory performance
of such systems.

“(d) Additional Rule-Making Authority. — The Commission for Public Health shall adopt a rule to amend 15A NCAC 18A .1969(j) (Modification of Approved Systems) consistent with Section 47(c) of this act. Notwithstanding G.S. 150B-19(4), the rule adopted
by the Commission pursuant to this section shall be substantively identical to the provisions of Section 47(c) of this act. Rules adopted pursuant to this section are not subject to Part 3 of Article 2A of Chapter 150B of the General
Statutes. Rules adopted pursuant to this section shall become effective as provided in G.S. 150B-21.3(b1) as though 10 or more written objections had been received as provided by G.S. 150B-21.3(b2).

“(e) Sunset. — Section 47(c) of this act expires on the date that the rule adopted pursuant to Section 47(d) of this act becomes effective.”

Session Laws 2019-151, ss. 5-12, provide: “Section 5. There is established the On-Site Wastewater Task Force (Task Force).

“Section 6. The Task Force shall consist of 10 members, as follows:

“(1) A representative of the North Carolina Division of Public Health, On-Site Water Protection Branch.

“(2) A person currently certified as a Water Pollution Control Systems Operator and actively conducting business as an operator of on-site wastewater systems.

“(3) A representative of the North Carolina Environmental Health Supervisors Association.

“(4) A representative of the North Carolina Home Builders Association.

“(5) A representative of the North Carolina On-Site Wastewater Contractor Inspector Certification Board.

“(6) A representative of the North Carolina Licensing Board for General Contractors.

“(7) A representative of the North Carolina Septic Tank Association.

“(8) A representative of the Consulting Soil Scientists Association of North Carolina with experience conducting private consultative services of sites evaluated for on-site wastewater systems.

“(9) A representative of the North Carolina Board of Examiners for Engineers and Surveyors with experience in designing on-site wastewater systems.

“(10) A representative of the North Carolina Board for Licensing of Soil Scientists with experience conducting private consultative services of sites evaluated for on-site wastewater systems.

“Section 7. The first meeting of the Task Force shall be held no later than October 31, 2019. The Task Force member from the North Carolina Home Builders Association shall chair the first meeting of the Task Force. The permanent chair of the Task Force
shall be elected by a majority of the members of the Task Force present and voting at the first meeting. A majority of the Task Force members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. No action may be taken except
by a majority vote at a meeting at which a quorum is present.

“Section 8. The Task Force may meet at various locations around the State in order to promote greater public participation in its deliberations and to accommodate the travel considerations of the members. The Legislative Services Commission shall grant
adequate meeting space to the Task Force in the State Legislative Building or the Legislative Office Building. The Legislative Services Commission shall allocate from a portion of the funds appropriated to the General Assembly sufficient
funds for the operation of the Task Force. The Task Force may contract for professional, clerical, or consultant services as provided by

G.S. 120-32.02

. Members of the Task Force shall receive subsistence and travel expenses at the rates provided in

G.S. 120-3.1

, 138-5, or 138-6, as appropriate.

“Section 9. The Task Force shall conduct a study and issue a report to recommend new wastewater rules to the Commission of Public Health. In conducting this study, the Task Force may collaborate with any stakeholders it deems appropriate. The report must
make recommendations for all of the following:

“(1) New rules to replace the rules adopted by the Commission for Public Health and approved by the Rules Review Commission, which were to be codified in Chapter 18E of Title 15A of the North Carolina Administrative Code. The new rule recommendations
should replace the rules disapproved by Section 1 through Section 4 of this act, as well as any rules that meet all of the following criteria: (i) adoption by the Commission of Public Health on August 8, 2018, (ii) approval by the
Rules Review Commission on October 18, 2018, or November 15, 2018, (iii) codification in Chapter 18E of Title 15A of the North Carolina Administrative Code, and (iv) relation to on-site wastewater treatment and dispersal.

“(2) New rules to prevent the implementation of rules and ordinances and enforcement against the use of on-site wastewater treatment and dispersal systems in non-sewered areas of the State.

“Section 10. The Task Force shall transmit its report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources, the Environmental Review Commission, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services,
and the Commission for Public Health no later than February 1, 2020. The Task Force will terminate on the earlier of the date it transmits its report or February 1, 2020.

“Section 11. 15A NCAC 18A.1934 through.1971 shall remain in effect until new rules adopted by the Commission for Public Health to replace them become effective. 15A NCAC 18A .1934 through .1971 shall be exempt from the periodic review and expiration of
existing rules process required by

G.S. 150B-21.3

A.

“Section 12. The rules for on-site wastewater treatment and dispersal cited as 15A NCAC 18E.0101-.0102, .0104, .0201-.0207, .0301-.0302, .0304-.0305, .0501- .0507, .0509-.0510, .0601-.0602, .0701-.0703, .0801-.0804, .0901-.0911, .1001, .1103, .1201, .1302,
.1403, .1405-.1406, .1501-.1505, .1601-.1603, adopted by the Commission for Public Health on August 8, 2018, and approved by the Rules Review Commission on October 18, 2018, and November 15, 2018, shall not become effective if the
rules specifically enumerated in Sections 1 through 4 of this act are disapproved.”

Session Laws 2019-151, ss. 1-4, provide: “Section 1. Pursuant to G.S. 150B-21.3(b1), the following rules, as adopted by the North Carolina Commission for Public Health on August 8, 2018, and approved by the Rules Review Commission on October 18, 2018,
are disapproved:

“15A NCAC 18E.0103 (Incorporation by Reference)

“15A NCAC 18E.0105 (Definitions)

“15A NCAC 18E.0303 (Licensed or Certified Professionals)

“15A NCAC 18E.0401 (Design Daily Flow)

“15A NCAC 18E.0402 (Septic Tank Effluent Characteristics)

“15A NCAC 18E.0403 (Adjustments to Design Daily Flow)

“15A NCAC 18E.0505 (Soil Depth)

“15A NCAC 18E.0805 (Tank Leak Testing and Installation Requirements)

“15A NCAC 18E.1401 (Plans for Prefabricated Tanks)

“15A NCAC 18E.1402 (Tank Design and Construction)

“15A NCAC 18E.1404 (Plans and Specifications for Risers, Effluent Filters, and Pipe Penetration Boots)

“Section 2. Pursuant to G.S. 150B-21.3(b1), the following rules, as adopted by the North Carolina Commission for Public Health on August 8, 2018, and approved by the Rules Review Commission on November 15, 2018, are disapproved:

“15A NCAC 18E.1002 (Reclaimed Water Systems)

“15A NCAC 18E.1101 (General Dosing System Requirements)

“15A NCAC 18E.1102 (Pump Dosing)

“15A NCAC 18E.1104 (Siphon Dosing)

“15A NCAC 18E.1105 (Timed Dosing)

“15A NCAC 18E.1106 (Pressure Dosed Gravity Distribution Devices)

“15A NCAC 18E.1202 (Siting and Sizing Criteria for Advanced Pretreatment Systems with a Design Daily Flow Less Than or Equal to 1,500 Gallons/Day)

“15A NCAC 18E.1203 (Siting and Sizing Criteria for Advanced Pretreatment Systems with a Design Daily Flow Greater Than 1,500 Gallons/Day and Less Than or Equal to 3,000 Gallons/Day)

“15A NCAC 18E.1204 (Advanced Pretreatment Drip Dispersal Systems)

“15A NCAC 18E.1205 (Advanced Pretreatment Sand Lined Trench Systems)

“15A NCAC 18E.1206 (Advanced Pretreatment Bed Systems)

“15A NCAC 18E.1303 (Owner Responsibilities for Wastewater System Operation and Maintenance)

“15A NCAC 18E.1304 (Management Entity Responsibilities for Wastewater System Operation and Maintenance)

“15A NCAC 18E.1305 (Local Health Department Responsibilities for Wastewater System Operation and Maintenance)

“15A NCAC 18E.1306 (System Malfunction and Repair)

“15A NCAC 18E.1307 (Wastewater System Abandonment)

“15A NCAC 18E.1701 (General)

“15A NCAC 18E.1702 (Application)

“15A NCAC 18E.1703 (Department and Commission Application Review)

“15A NCAC 18E.1704 (Approval Criteria for Provisional Systems)

“15A NCAC 18E.1705 (Approval Criteria for Innovative Systems)

“15A NCAC 18E.1706 (Approval Criteria for Accepted Systems)

“15A NCAC 18E.1707 (Design and Installation Criteria for Provisional, Innovative, and Accepted Approvals)

“15A NCAC 18E.1709 (Wastewater Sampling Requirements for Advanced Pretreatment Systems)

“15A NCAC 18E.1710 (Compliance Criteria for Advanced Pretreatment Systems)

“15A NCAC 18E.1711 (Provisional and Innovative Approval Renewal)

“15A NCAC 18E.1712 (Authorized Designers, Installers, and Management Entities)

“15A NCAC 18E.1713 (Local Health Department Responsibilities)

“Section 3. Pursuant to G.S. 150B-21.3(b1) and S.L. 2015-147, the following rules, as adopted by the North Carolina Commission for Public Health on August 8, 2018, are disapproved:

“15A NCAC 18E.0508 (Available Space)

“15A NCAC 18E.1301 (Operation and Maintenance of Wastewater Systems)

“Section 4. Pursuant to G.S. 150B-21.3(b1) and S.L. 2014-120, Section 47, the following rule, as adopted by the North Carolina Commission for Public Health on August 8, 2018, is disapproved:

“15A NCAC 18E.1708 (Modification, Suspension, and Revocation of Approvals).”

§ 130A-335.1.
Effluent filters and access devices for certain septic tank systems.

The person who manufactures, installs, repairs, or pumps any septic tank to be installed in this State as a part of a septic tank system that is designed to treat 3,000 gallons per day or less of sewage shall provide an effluent filter approved by the
Department pursuant to the requirements of

G.S. 130A-335

, this section, and rules adopted by the Commission. Any person who manufactures, installs, repairs, or pumps systems described in this section may purchase and install any approved filters on the systems. The person
who installs the effluent filter shall install the effluent filter as a part of the septic tank system in accordance with the specifications provided by the manufacturer of the effluent filter. An effluent filter shall:

Be made of materials that are capable of withstanding the corrosives to which septic tank systems are normally subject.

Prevent solid material larger than one-sixteenth of an inch, as measured along the shortest axis of the material, from entering the drainfield.

Be designed and constructed to allow for routine maintenance.

Be designed and constructed so as not to require maintenance more frequently than once in any three-year period under normally anticipated use.

The access device required by

G.S. 130A-335(f)

shall provide access to each compartment of a septic tank for inspection and maintenance either by means of an opening in the top of the septic tank or by a riser assembly and shall include an appropriate cover.
The access device shall:

Be of sufficient size to facilitate inspection and service.

Be designed and constructed to equal or exceed the minimum loading specifications applicable to the septic tank.

Prevent water entry.

Come to within six inches of the finished grade.

Be visibly marked so that the access device can be readily located.

History.
1998-126, s. 2; 2006-255, s. 4; 2006-264, s. 63(a).